Illinois, session 104th, SB4156.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $8,997,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Student 7Assistance Commission from the General Revenue Fund to meet 8its operational expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 92027. 10    Section 10. The following named amount, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for the 13following purpose:14  To support outreach, research,15   and training activities..........................8,357,000 16    Section 15. The sum of $221,556,200, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Student 18Assistance Commission from the General Revenue Fund for grant 19awards to students eligible for the Monetary Award Program, as 20provided by law, and for agency administrative and operational 21costs not to exceed 2 percent of the total appropriation for   SB4156- 2 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1the Monetary Award Program. 2    Section 20. The sum of $500,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Student 4Assistance Commission from the Education Assistance Fund for 5grant awards to students eligible for the Monetary Award 6Program, as provided by law. 7    Section 25. The sum of $50,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Student 9Assistance Commission from the General Revenue Fund for 10payments to eligible public universities for grants to 11students pursuant to the AIM HIGH program. 12    Section 30. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 14Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for payment 15of the Illinois Veterans' Grants and Illinois National Guard 16Grants at state-controlled universities for students eligible, 17as provided by law. 18    Section 35. The sum of $150,000, or so much thereof as may 19be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 20the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for costs 21associated with providing grants to exonerated persons, as 22provided by law.   SB4156- 3 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1    Section 40. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 3Assistance Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 4for financial assistance and administrative costs associated 5with early childhood programs. 6    Section 45. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for costs 9associated with Social Worker Scholarships and loan repayment 10assistance. 11    Section 50. The sum of $7,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for costs 14associated with the Prepare for Illinois' Future Program. 15    Section 55. The sum of $26,400, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 17Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for costs 18associated with the Veterans' Home Medical Providers' Loan 19Repayment Program pursuant to Public Act 99-0813. 20    Section 60. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance   SB4156- 4 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for grants 2to eligible nurse educators to use for payment of their 3educational loan pursuant to Public Act 94-1020. 4    Section 65. The following named sums, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 6Education Assistance Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance 7Commission for the following purposes:8GRANTS AND SCHOLARSHIPS9  For the payment of scholarships to students10   who are children of police officers or 11   firefighters killed in the line of duty, 12   dependents of correctional officers killed13   or who are or permanently disabled in the14   line of duty, as provided by law.................1,100,00015  For the payment of Scholarships under the 16   Teachers of Illinois Scholarship Program.........8,000,00017    Total                                          $9,100,000 18    Section 70. The sum of $10,750,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 20Assistance Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 21to the Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois program, as provided 22by law. 23    Section 75. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as   SB4156- 5 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 2Assistance Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 3to the Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois program for the 4Golden Apple Accelerators Program. 5    Section 80. The sum of $975,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 7Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for the 8Loan Repayment for Teachers Program. 9    Section 85. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the ISAC Accounts 11Receivable Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 12for costs associated with the collection of delinquent 13scholarship awards pursuant to the Illinois State Collection 14Act of 1986. 15    Section 90. The sum of $110,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Student 17Assistance Commission from the University Grant Fund for 18payment of grants for the Higher Education License Plate 19Program, as provided by law. 20    Section 95. The following named sum, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Student 22Assistance Commission Contracts and Grants Fund to the   SB4156- 6 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1Illinois Student Assistance Commission for the following 2purpose:3  To support outreach, research,4   and training activities..........................5,000,0005  Community Behavioral Health Care6   Provider Loan Repayment Program..................7,500,0007    Total                                         $12,500,000 8    Section 100. The following named sum, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Optometric 10Licensing and Disciplinary Board Fund to the Illinois Student 11Assistance Commission for the following purpose:12GRANTS AND SCHOLARSHIPS13  For payment of scholarships for the14   Optometric Education Scholarship15   Program, as provided by law.........................50,000 16    Section 105. The following named sum, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the National Guard 18and Naval Militia Grant Fund to the Illinois Student 19Assistance Commission for the following purpose:20Grants and Scholarships21  For payment of Illinois National Guard and22   Naval Militia Scholarships at23   State-controlled universities and public24   community colleges in Illinois to sturdents  SB4156- 7 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1   eligible to receive such awards, 2   as provided by law..................................20,000 3    Section 110. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Golden Apple Scholars 5of Illinois Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 6for the Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois Program, as provided 7by law. 8    Section 115. The following named sums, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 10Illinois Student Assistance Commission from the Student Loan 11Operating Fund for its ordinary and contingent expenses:12  For Personal Services............................13,538,60013  For State Contributions to State14   Employees Retirement System......................7,312,60015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security..................................1,029,00017  For State Contributions for18   Employees Group Insurance........................5,436,80019  For Contractual Services..........................8,374,30020  For Travel..........................................311,00021  For Commodities.....................................282,20022  For Printing........................................501,00023  For Equipment.......................................540,00024  For Telecommunication Services....................1,377,200  SB4156- 8 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................38,4002  For Refunds.......................................4,500,0003    Total                                         $43,241,100 4    Section 120. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Student 6Assistance Commission from the Student Loan Operating Fund for 7costs associated with the Illinois Designated Account Purchase 8Program. 9    Section 125. The following named sum, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal 11Congressional Teacher Scholarship Program Fund to the Illinois 12Student Assistance Commission for the following purpose:13  For transferring repayment funds collected14   under the Paul Douglas Teacher Scholarship15   Program to the U.S. Treasury.......................100,000 16    Section 130. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Student 18Incentive Trust Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance 19Commission for allowable uses of federal grant funds related 20to college access, outreach, and training, including but not 21limited to funds received under the federal Gaining Early 22Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Program.   SB4156- 9 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1    Section 135. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Student 3Incentive Trust Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance 4Commission for the John R. Justice Student Loan Repayment 5Program. 6    Section 140. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Nursing Dedicated 8and Professional Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance 9Commission for expenses related to the Nursing Education 10Scholarship Law. 11    Section 145. The sum of $1,100,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy Transition 13Assistance Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 14for costs associated with providing grants to eligible 15individuals, for costs pursuant to the Energy Transition Act. 16    Section 150. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the UNCF Scholarship 18Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission to grant 19scholarships to public university and college students for the 20United Negro College Fund scholarship program. 21    Section 155. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois DREAM Fund   SB4156- 10 -OMB104 00303 HLR 10303 b1to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission to assist in 2funding scholarships and other statutory responsibilities of 3the Illinois DREAM Fund Commission. 4    Section 160. The sum of $350,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary is appropriated from the Illinois Student 6Assistance Commission Contracts and Grants Fund to the 7Illinois Student Assistance Commission for the costs 8associated with the Human Services Loan Repayment program. 9    Section 165. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Student 11Assistance Commission from the Student Loan Operating Fund for 12ordinary and contingent expenses of operating the Monetary 13Award Program.  14    Section 170. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary is appropriated from the Education Assistance 16Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for costs 17associated with the Human Services Loan Repayment program. 18    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.